Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-109
Civil liability of notary public; actions.

If any person shall be damaged or injured by the unlawful act, negligence or misconduct of any notary public in his official capacity, the person damaged or injured may maintain a civil action on the official bond of such notary public against such notary public, and his sureties, and a recovery in such action shall not be a bar to any future action for other causes to the full amount of the bond.

Laws 1869, § 8, p. 23;

G.S.1873, p. 495;

R.S.1913, § 5524;

C.S.1922, § 4820;

C.S.1929, § 64-108;

R.S.1943, § 64-109.